package/tsearch_data/cs_cz.dict
alkoholik/T po:noun
amoniak/U po:noun
aršík/U po:noun
astrofyzik/T po:noun
atak/U po:noun
automechanik/T po:noun
balík/T po:noun
baloňák/U po:noun
basák/T po:noun
báseň/Q po:noun
bavlník/U po:noun
bázeň/Q po:noun
bejk/T po:noun
bezďák/T po:noun
bezpočet/J po:noun
bikepark/U po:noun
biofyzik/T po:noun
blank/U po:noun
blázen/J po:noun
bobřík/T po:noun
bodák/U po:noun
bochník/U po:noun
bombarďák/U po:noun
Borovník/T po:noun
bourák/U po:noun
bouřlivák/T po:noun
brejk/U po:noun
brhlík/T po:noun
Brtník/T po:noun
brzlík/U po:noun
buben/J po:noun
bublák/T po:noun
buchet/J po:noun
buližník/U po:noun
buzík/T po:noun
bzučák/U po:noun
cedník/U po:noun
cesťák/T po:noun
ciferník/U po:noun
cizopasník/T po:noun
culík/U po:noun
cvik/U po:noun
cynik/T po:noun
černík/T po:noun
čertík/T po:noun
červen/J po:noun
červen/NJ po:verb
červeňák/U po:noun
číselník/U po:noun
číšník/T po:noun
čtyřicátník/T po:noun
čudlík/U po:noun
darebák/T po:noun
dáseň/Q po:noun
dávnověk/U po:noun
dehet/J po:noun
den/J po:noun
desetník/U po:noun
deváťák/T po:noun
didaktik/T po:noun
dispečink/U po:noun
divočák/T po:noun
dobrovolník/T po:noun
dojem/J po:noun
dolík/U po:noun
doskok/U po:noun
dospělák/T po:noun
dotisk/U po:noun
dozvuk/U po:noun
dražebník/T po:noun
drink/U po:noun
drobet/J po:noun
družeb/J po:noun
družstevník/T po:noun
dřevák/U po:noun
dudlík/U po:noun
dušník/T po:noun
dvanácterák/T po:noun
dvanáctník/U po:noun
dvojplošník/U po:noun
dynamik/T po:noun
džusík/U po:noun
elektrotechnik/T po:noun
esenbák/T po:noun
estetik/T po:noun
exotik/T po:noun
fenik/U po:noun
feťák/T po:noun
fíkovník/U po:noun
flek/U po:noun
flink/T po:noun
foťák/U po:noun
frk/U po:noun
fusak/U po:noun
gajdošík/T po:noun
genetik/T po:noun
gotik/T po:noun
grázlík/T po:noun
hadrák/U po:noun
hajzlík/T po:noun
hasák/U po:noun
hejlík/T po:noun
hermetik/T po:noun
hladík/U po:noun
hlaveň/Q po:noun
Hluk/U po:noun
hnojník/T po:noun
honzík/T po:noun
horník/T po:noun
hořák/U po:noun
hrk/U po:noun
hrošík/T po:noun
hrozen/J po:noun
hrozen/NJ po:verb
hrušeň/Q po:noun
humbuk/U po:noun
husák/T po:noun
hysterik/T po:noun
chemik/T po:noun
chlapík/T po:noun
chlebík/U po:noun
chlopeň/Q po:noun
cholerik/T po:noun
chyták/U po:noun
chytrák/T po:noun
jáhen/J po:noun
jarmark/U po:noun
jedlík/T po:noun
jezevčík/T po:noun
jícen/J po:noun
junák/T po:noun
kachlík/U po:noun
kajícník/T po:noun
kamioňák/T po:noun
kamrlík/U po:noun
kapelník/T po:noun
katafalk/U po:noun
katolík/T po:noun
kázeň/Q po:noun
kedluben/J po:noun
kejhák/U po:noun
kilometrovník/U po:noun
klasik/T po:noun
klíčník/T po:noun
klobouk/U po:noun
kluk/T po:noun
kluzák/U po:noun
kmitočet/J po:noun
kočárník/T po:noun
kočičák/U po:noun
kok/U po:noun
kolomazník/T po:noun
koňák/T po:noun
koncentrák/U po:noun
kopírák/U po:noun
korupčník/T po:noun
kostelník/T po:noun
koučink/U po:noun
kovák/T po:noun
kozlík/T po:noun
krejčík/T po:noun
krok/U po:noun
krvák/U po:noun
křečík/T po:noun
křižovník/T po:noun
ksichtík/U po:noun
kuchtík/T po:noun
kuklík/U po:noun
kulometčík/T po:noun
kurzík/U po:noun
kuřák/T po:noun
kvark/U po:noun
kyberpunk/U po:noun
laclík/U po:noun
lajdák/T po:noun
lapák/U po:noun
lazebník/T po:noun
lázeň/Q po:noun
leden/J po:noun
len/J po:noun
lesník/T po:noun
lesopark/U po:noun
letopočet/J po:noun
lev/J po:noun
lev/NJ po:verb
Lezník/T po:noun
líheň/Q po:noun
liják/U po:noun
lišák/T po:noun
lok/U po:noun
loket/J po:noun
Loket/J po:noun
loskuták/T po:noun
lumpík/T po:noun
lusk/U po:noun
macík/T po:noun
majstrštyk/U po:noun
maliník/U po:noun
maloobchodník/T po:noun
mariňák/T po:noun
matematik/T po:noun
medák/T po:noun
medovník/U po:noun
melancholik/T po:noun
metodik/T po:noun
metrák/U po:noun
mezistupeň/J po:noun
milník/U po:noun
minižák/T po:noun
míšeň/Q po:noun
mítink/U po:noun
mladík/T po:noun
modrák/T po:noun
monoblok/U po:noun
mopslík/T po:noun
moučník/U po:noun
mravenečník/T po:noun
mravkolev/J po:noun
mrk/U po:noun
mužik/T po:noun
nácvik/U po:noun
náčelník/T po:noun
nádvorník/T po:noun
nájem/J po:noun
náklaďák/U po:noun
nálevník/T po:noun
nanuk/U po:noun
nápravník/T po:noun
nároďák/U po:noun
nátělník/U po:noun
náušník/U po:noun
návštevník/T po:noun
název/J po:noun
náznak/U po:noun
nedouk/T po:noun
nehet/J po:noun
nekázeň/Q po:noun
nepolitik/T po:noun
nepřízeň/Q po:noun
nespočet/J po:noun
netík/U po:noun
neurotik/T po:noun
nezájem/J po:noun
nezvyk/U po:noun
nocležník/T po:noun
nosík/U po:noun
notorik/T po:noun
nožík/U po:noun
oběžník/U po:noun
oblek/U po:noun
oborník/U po:noun
Obrok/U po:noun
obřík/T po:noun
obtisk/U po:noun
ocet/J po:noun
odečet/J po:noun
odpadlík/T po:noun
odpočet/J po:noun
odskok/U po:noun
oheň/J po:noun
okamžik/U po:noun
olejník/T po:noun
oliheň/Q po:noun
omak/U po:noun
opozičník/T po:noun
ořešák/U po:noun
osadník/T po:noun
osmdesátník/T po:noun
osten/J po:noun
Otěvěk/U po:noun
otvírák/U po:noun
ozev/J po:noun
padesátník/T po:noun
palčák/U po:noun
pamětník/T po:noun
panelák/U po:noun
paranoik/T po:noun
parník/U po:noun
pašák/T po:noun
patchwork/U po:noun
pavouk/T po:noun
pecen/J po:noun
peň/J po:noun
pěnišník/U po:noun
pestík/U po:noun
pilník/T po:noun
pípák/U po:noun
píseň/Q po:noun
plak/U po:noun
plastik/T po:noun
plíseň/Q po:noun
ploužák/U po:noun
plyšák/T po:noun
plzeň/Q po:noun
Plzeň/Q po:noun
počet/J po:noun
podhlavník/U po:noun
podnájem/J po:noun
podnázev/J po:noun
podporučík/T po:noun
pohřeb/J po:noun
pochodeň/Q po:noun
pojem/J po:noun
pojistník/T po:noun
politik/T po:noun
pomerančovník/U po:noun
poručík/T po:noun
posuvník/U po:noun
poutník/T po:noun
povodeň/Q po:noun
Pozdeň/Q po:noun
prácheň/Q po:noun
Prácheň/Q po:noun
prak/U po:noun
pravák/T po:noun
prohlubeň/Q po:noun
pronájem/J po:noun
propadák/U po:noun
propočet/J po:noun
prosebník/T po:noun
průjem/J po:noun
průnik/U po:noun
průzkumník/T po:noun
pryskyřník/U po:noun
předstupeň/J po:noun
předškolák/T po:noun
přepočet/J po:noun
přetisk/U po:noun
příjem/J po:noun
přítlak/U po:noun
přízeň/Q po:noun
psychotik/T po:noun
půlrok/U po:noun
půltucet/J po:noun
punk/T po:noun
Rakovník/T po:noun
rašeliník/U po:noun
ret/J po:noun
rohlík/U po:noun
ropák/T po:noun
roveň/Q po:noun
Roveň/Q po:noun
rozkrok/U po:noun
rozpočet/J po:noun
rožeň/J po:noun
ruksak/U po:noun
rybařík/T po:noun
řezák/U po:noun
říjen/J po:noun
samouk/T po:noun
sebekázeň/Q po:noun
sekerník/T po:noun
sen/J po:noun
Seník/U po:noun
silk/U po:noun
skalník/T po:noun
sklizeň/Q po:noun
skrblík/T po:noun
slamák/U po:noun
směnárník/T po:noun
smeťák/U po:noun
sokolník/T po:noun
součet/J po:noun
soumrak/U po:noun
spolubojovník/T po:noun
spoluvězeň/J po:noun
sporťák/T po:noun
srpen/J po:noun
sršeň/J po:noun
staďák/U po:noun
státník/T po:noun
stěžeň/J po:noun
stoupák/U po:noun
strašák/T po:noun
studeň/NQ po:verb
studentík/T po:noun
stulík/U po:noun
stupeň/J po:noun
svěťák/U po:noun
svícen/J po:noun
svícen/NJ po:verb
svůdník/T po:noun
šatník/U po:noun
šerák/T po:noun
šev/J po:noun
šmik/U po:noun
šmírák/T po:noun
šroubovák/U po:noun
štuk/U po:noun
švihák/T po:noun
techničák/U po:noun
technik/T po:noun
tejden/J po:noun
tesk/U po:noun
tíseň/Q po:noun
toaleťák/U po:noun
továrník/T po:noun
trestňák/U po:noun
truhlík/T po:noun
trýzeň/Q po:noun
třáseň/Q po:noun
třešeň/Q po:noun
tucet/J po:noun
tuplák/U po:noun
týden/J po:noun
tygřík/T po:noun
učeň/J po:noun
účet/J po:noun
úkolovník/U po:noun
uprchlík/T po:noun
úroveň/Q po:noun
úsek/U po:noun
useň/Q po:noun
úvodník/U po:noun
vápník/U po:noun
vášeň/Q po:noun
věchet/J po:noun
vekslák/T po:noun
verbuňk/U po:noun
větřík/U po:noun
vězeň/J po:noun
višeň/Q po:noun
višňák/T po:noun
vodník/T po:noun
vodočet/J po:noun
vodotrysk/U po:noun
vstřik/U po:noun
všivák/T po:noun
výčet/J po:noun
výheň/Q po:noun
Výheň/Q po:noun
výložník/U po:noun
výpočet/J po:noun
výstřik/U po:noun
vzduchotechnik/T po:noun
vzkazík/U po:noun
záblesk/U po:noun
zájem/J po:noun
zákazník/T po:noun
zánik/U po:noun
zápasník/T po:noun
zápočet/J po:noun
zárubeň/Q po:noun
závoďák/U po:noun
zbojník/T po:noun
zisk/U po:noun
zorník/U po:noun
zpátečník/T po:noun
zvyk/U po:noun
žebrák/T po:noun
žeň/Q po:noun
žeň/NQ po:verb
žízeň/Q po:noun
žok/U po:noun
